Massachusetts, session 194th, S828.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 12 of Chapter 176J of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 
edition is hereby amended in line 35 by striking the number "6" and inserting in place thereof the 
following:- "8" 
SECTION 2. Said section 12 of chapter 176J of the General Laws is hereby amended in 
line 39 by striking the number "85,000" and inserting in place thereof the following:-"100,000" 
SECTION 3. Section 13(b) of chapter 176J of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking subsection (v) in its entirety.